North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 1B. Age Limits for Service as Justice or Judge.

§ 7A-4.20.
Age limit for service as justice or judge: exception.

No justice or judge of the General Court of Justice may continue in office beyond the last day of the month in which he attains his seventy-second birthday, but justices and judges so retired may be recalled for periods of temporary service as provided in Subchapters II and III of this chapter.

History.

1971, c. 508, s. 1; c. 1194; 1973, c. 248; 1977, c. 736, s. 5; 1981, c. 455, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 873, s. 1.

§ 7A-4.21.
Validation of official actions of district court judges of twenty-fifth judicial district performed after mandatory retirement age.

No official action performed by any judge of the twenty-fifth judicial district of the district court division of the General Court of Justice shall be declared to be invalid by reason of the fact that the judge was beyond the mandatory retirement age set out in

G.S. 7A-4.20

at the time of his performing any such act; provided this section shall only apply to those official actions performed prior to May 1, 1977.

History.

1977, c. 389.